Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-2105
Garbage disposal plants or systems and solid waste disposal areas; contracts.

In a city of the first class, city of the second class, or village which purchases, constructs, maintains, or improves garbage disposal plants or systems or solid waste disposal areas pursuant to section 19-2101, the city council or village board of trustees may also make and enter into a contract or contracts with any person, firm, or corporation for the construction, maintenance, or operation of a garbage disposal plant or system or solid waste disposal area.

Laws 1947, c. 54, § 5, p. 184;

Laws 1969, c. 117, § 4, p. 535;

Laws 2019, LB193, § 134.